apertium-kmr.kmr.dix
    <pardef n="bid/an__vblex_tv">
        <e><p><l>im</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>im</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>î</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>î</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>in</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>in</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>in</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>in</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>in</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>in</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

  <pardef n="did/an__vblex_tv">
        <e><p><l>im</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>î</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>in</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>in</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>in</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>im</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="prog"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>î</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="prog"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="prog"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>in</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="prog"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>in</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="prog"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>in</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="prog"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ma/n_vblex_iv">
        <e><p><l>m</l><r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>y</l><r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>n</l><r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>n</l><r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>n</l><r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>me</l><r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="narr"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ye</l><r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="narr"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ye</l><r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="narr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ne</l><r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="narr"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ne</l><r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="narr"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ne</l><r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="narr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="dim/_vblex_iv">
        <e><p><l>am</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="prog"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ayî</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="prog"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="prog"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>an</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="prog"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>an</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="prog"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>an</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="prog"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ame</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="prog"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ayî</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="prog"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>aye</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="prog"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="prog"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="prog"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="prog"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bim/_vblex_iv">
        <e><p><l>ama</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="opt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ayayî</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="opt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>aya</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="opt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ana</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="opt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ana</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="opt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ana</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="opt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ama</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fpi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ayayî</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fpi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>aya</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fpi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ana</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fpi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ana</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fpi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ana</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fpi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="şo/__vblex">
        <e><p><l>m</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>yî</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>n</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>n</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>n</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 

    <pardef n="div/êtin__vblex">
        <e><p><l>ê</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>êt</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>abû</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="plu"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>a<b/>bû</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="plu"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>iyabû</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>iya<b/>bû</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 

    <e lm="dengdan"><p><l>dengdid</l><r>dengdan</r></p><par n="did/an__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="dengdan"><p><l>dengbid</l><r>dengdan</r></p><par n="bid/an__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="hewldan"><p><l>hewldid</l><r>hewldan</r></p><par n="did/an__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="hewldan"><p><l>hewlbid</l><r>hewldan</r></p><par n="bid/an__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="hewldan"><p><l>hewl<b/>did</l><r>hewldan</r></p><par n="did/an__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="hewldan"><p><l>hewl<b/>bid</l><r>hewldan</r></p><par n="bid/an__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="pêşandan"><p><l>pêşandid</l><r>pêşandan</r></p><par n="did/an__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="pêşandan"><p><l>pêşanbid</l><r>pêşandan</r></p><par n="bid/an__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="hewldan"><p><l>hewldid</l><r>hewldan</r></p><par n="did/an__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="hewldan"><p><l>hewlbid</l><r>hewldan</r></p><par n="bid/an__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="tevdan"><p><l>tevdid</l><r>tevdan</r></p><par n="did/an__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="tevdan"><p><l>tevbid</l><r>tevdan</r></p><par n="bid/an__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="hildan"><p><l>hildid</l><r>hildan</r></p><par n="did/an__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="hildan"><p><l>hilbid</l><r>hildan</r></p><par n="bid/an__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="nîşandan"><p><l>nîşandid</l><r>nîşandan</r></p><par n="did/an__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="nîşandan"><p><l>nîşanbid</l><r>nîşandan</r></p><par n="bid/an__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="divêtin"><p><l>div</l><r>divêtin</r></p><par n="div/êtin__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="man"><p><l>dim</l><r>man</r></p><par n="dim/_vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="dan"><p><l>did</l><r>dan</r></p><par n="did/an__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="dan"><p><l>bid</l><r>dan</r></p><par n="bid/an__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="berdan"><p><l>berdid</l><r>berdan</r></p><par n="did/an__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="berdan"><p><l>berbid</l><r>berdan</r></p><par n="bid/an__vblex_tv"/></e>
